Environment Protection Token

Global environmental protection ecosystem

based on blockchain technology

```
EPTInternationalEnvironmentalProtectionFoundation • 2022
```

## CONTENTS


- ChapterIProjectDevelopmentBackground..........................................................................
   - 1 1 Globalmarketstatusquoofenvironmentalprotectionindustry............................
   - 1 2 Painpointsinenvironmentalprotectionindustry........................................................
   - 1 3 Blockchaintechnologyandapplication..........................................................................
   - 1 4 ThebirthoftheEPTproject..............................................................................................
- ChapterIIEPTProjectOverview.................................................................................................
   - 2 1 EPTProjectIntroduction....................................................................................................
   - 2 2 EPTenvironmentalprotectionsolutions.......................................................................
   - 2 3 EPTbasictechnologysystem...........................................................................................
   - 2 4 ValuecreationoftheEPT..................................................................................................
   - 2 5 WhychooseBSCasthebottomofthesystem...........................................................
- ChapterIIIEPTSystemArchitectureSystem.........................................................................
   - 3 1 EPTTheunderlyingsystemarchitecture.......................................................................
   - 3 2 AnonymouscommunicationtechnologybasedonP 2 P..........................................
   - 3 3 EPTunderlyingdatastructure..........................................................................................
   - 3 4 Tradeanonymousprotection...........................................................................................
   - 3 5 Smartcontract......................................................................................................................
   - 3 6 Multiplesupportoftechnology......................................................................................
- ChapterIVExampleoftheEPTEcologicalPlate...................................................................
   - 4 1 Environmentalprotectionclasschaintourapplication............................................
   - 4 2 EPTMallecology..................................................................................................................
   - 4 3 EPTlendingecology...........................................................................................................
   - 4 4 ADeFi-basedcrowdfundingsystem..............................................................................
- ChapterVEPTCertifiedEconomicModel
   - 5 1 EPTTokenEconomics.........................................................................................................
   - 5 2 ValuepropertiesoftheEPT..............................................................................................
   - 5 3 Liquidityminingmodel......................................................................................................
   - 5 4 Pledgelendingmodel........................................................................................................
- ChapterVI:GlobalTeamandDAOGovernanc......................................................................
   - 6 1 TheEPTGlobalTeam..........................................................................................................
   - 6 2 CommunityDAOgovernance..........................................................................................
- ChapterVII:EPTInternationalEnvironmentalProtectionFoundation........................
- ChapterVIII.Disclaimer.................................................................................................................


# chapter II

# Project development

# background


### 1 1 Globalmarketstatusquoofenvironmentalprotectionindustry............................

Theimpactofhumanlifeonthenaturalenvironmenthasbeenmoreimportant
thanwecanimagine.SincetheIndustrialRevolution,theproblemofenvironmental
pollutionhasincreasedandhasanincreasingimpactonourlives.Atpresent,we
face environmental pollution problems:global warming, biodiversityreduction,
ozone layer destruction, air pollution, water pollution and other problems,
increasedgreenhousegasesmaketheglobalclimatewarm,resultinginfrequent
naturaldisasters;consumptionofwildlifeleadstooutbreaksofinfectiousdiseases,
randomwasteleadstowaterpollution.Therefore,thepublicwelfareundertakings
ofenvironmentalprotectionandtherestorationofavirtuousecologicalcycleare
thecurrentfocusofenvironmentalprotectionundertakings.

Inrecentyears,countriesaroundtheworldhavepaidmoreandmoreattention
toenvironmentalprotectionandsustainabledevelopment,andthescaleofthe
environmentalprotectionindustryhasbeen growingsteadily.In 2021 ,theglobal
environmentalprotectionindustryreachedUS$ 1 , 168. 2 billion.Withthewidespread
popularization of the concept of environmental protection and sustainable
development,theworldenvironmentalprotectionmarkethasshownamomentum
of rapid development. Countries around the world, especially the developed
countries,haveissuedrelevantpoliciesandincreasedcapitalinvestmenttoincrease
thesupportfortheenvironmentalprotectionmarket.Itisexpectedthattheglobal
environmentalprotectionmarketwillcontinuetomaintainasteadydevelopment
trendinthefuture,andthetotalglobalscalewillreachUS$ 1 , 388. 580 billionby
2022 .At present, the environmental industry and industry are the most
representativedevelopmentsin theUnitedStates,EuropeandJapan.TheUnited
States is the largest country in the environmental protection market today,
accountingformorethanone-thirdoftheglobalenvironmentalprotectionmarket
scale,andEuropeisintheworld'ssecondpositioninthefieldofenvironmental
protection.

With the refinement of environmental protection technology, high-end
demandandapplication scenarios,inthecurrentwidelyusedwatertreatment,
atmospherictreatment,solidwastetechnology,focuswith emergingtechnology,
environmentalprotectiontechnologyinnovation,withmodernbiotechnology,new


materials,anewgenerationofinformationtechnologyasthecoredrivingforce,
further improve the processingcapacityofenvironmental protection products,
promote environmental technology innovation breakthrough bottleneck,
acceleratethetransformationandupgradingofenvironmentalprotectionindustry.

In the context of tighter global resource constraints and intensified
environmental pollution, timely and accurate environmental monitoring and
testing data will become an important basis for auxiliary environmental
managementandscientificdecision-making,aswellasanimportantbasisforthe
evaluation of environmental quality and pollution control
effectiveness.Environmentalprotectiontechnologyandequipmentareaccelerating
the development of high-end and precision,to further improve the reliability,
accuracy and stability of environmental protection data.Big data, artificial
intelligence, Internet of things and other technologies in the global scope,
intelligenttechnologyintothefieldofenvironmentalprotection,throughonline
monitoring equipment monitoring pollution data information, and with the
network transmission to data center for summary analysis, realize real-time
monitoring,emergencyresponseandscientificdecision-makingfunctions,willbe
themaindevelopmenttrendofenvironmentalprotectiontechnologyapplication
andsupervisionandmanagement.

### 1 2 Painpointsinenvironmentalprotectionindustry........................................................

Theincreasinglyseriousenvironmentalprotectionproblemrequiresthejoint
efforts of all mankind.However, there are many disadvantages to the current
environmentalprotection:

**1 ) The level of high-end technology in the energy-saving and
environmentalprotectionindustryneedstobeimproved**

Atpresent,thefieldofenergy-savingandenvironmentalprotectionupstream
equipmentisamarketclosetofullcompetition,andalargenumberofsmalland
medium-sized enterprises compete on price, product and service quality. The
overall industry concentration in the field of global energy conservation and


environmentalprotectionupstreamequipmentisrelativelypoor,andthedegreeof
marketization islow.Conventionaltechnologyproductsfor energyconservation
andenvironmentalprotectionarerelativelymature,buttheyarestilllackingin
high-end technology products. Companies are generally small in scale and
low-leveloperationsaremorecommon.

**2 )Themidstreamfinancingcapacityisweak,andtheindustrialoperation
modelneedstobeimproved**

Due tothelonginvestment cycle,large capitaldemand,slowerinvestment
returns,andgreaterpolicyimpacts,andthecurrentservicemarketorderisnot
standardized, most energy conservation and environmental protection service
companiesaresmallinscaleandlowinservicelevels.Therefore,companiesThey
are generally faced with the dilemma of "difficult financing and expensive
financing".

```
3 )Unreasonableenterprisescaleandproductstructure
```
First, the scale structure of environmental protection enterprises is
unreasonable, their scale is small, and a number of large-scale backbone
enterprisesorenterprisegroupshavenotyetbeenformed,andtheylackmarket
competitiveness. Second,the structureofenvironmentalprotection products is
unreasonable,thelevelofcomplete,serialization,standardization,andlocalization
ofenvironmentalprotectionequipmentislow,andthephenomenonoflow-level
repeatedconstructionisserious.

```
4 )Centralizedoperation
```
AlthoughtheInternetofThingstechnologyhasbeenwidelyusedunderICT
technology,the APP of each brand isformed into a system, and they are all
operatedinacentralizedmanner.Theycannotoperateacrossplatforms,andthey
cannotmanageenergyinaunifiedmanner,resultinginenergywaste.

**5 ) Theintegrityofthedatacannotbe guaranteed, and itis easytobe
tamperedwith**

Environmental datamaybe damagedor overwritten during the recording
process.


```
6 )Datacannotbetransparent
```
```
Itisnotpossibletoknowandverifyhowthedatacontentchangesovertime.
```
```
7 )Unabletoprotectprivacy
```
Theuser'sIDonthecentralizedplatformiscompletelyreal-named,andprivacy
isunobserved.

```
8 )Lackoftrust
```
Duetotrustissues,thedatabetweenvariousplatformsanddevicescannotbe
communicated,resultinginunnecessaryenergywaste,anditisnotconduciveto
thedetectionandanalysisoftheoverallenvironment;forexample,thedetection
dataofvariousinstrumentscannotbeexchangedduetothelackofa"consensus
mechanism".Tomeet thereview requirements,datacan onlybecollectedand
analyzedineachcentralizedlocalareanetwork.

```
9 )Unorganizedcommunityconstruction
```
Non-profit organizations are unable to organize environmental protection
activitiesinareasonableandcoordinatedmanner,andusershaveaweaksenseof
participation.Asaresult,non-profitactivitiesonlypursuequantityandlackquality,
whichresultsinawasteofresources.

Manyproblemsinthefieldofenvironmentalprotectionneedtobesolved
urgently,andtheemergenceofnewtechnologiesandnewmodelshasprovided
newideasforsolvingsuchproblems,especiallyblockchaintechnology.Thebirth
anddevelopmentofblockchain technologyhavebroughtglobalenvironmental
protection. The new changes have also laid the foundation for the global
environmentalprotectionindustryupgradeandvaluecirculationinnovation.


### 1 3 Blockchaintechnologyandapplication..........................................................................

```
Blockchainistheuseofblockchaindatastructuretoverifyandstoredata,the
useofdistributednodeconsensusalgorithmtogenerateandupdatedata,
the use of cryptography technology to ensure the security of data
transmission and access control, the use of intelligence composed of
automated script code A new distributed infrastructure and computing
paradigminwhichcontractsareusedtoprogramandmanipulatedata.The
existing blockchain technology mainly includes the following four
characteristics:
```
- Decentralization: No need for a third party to intervene to achieve
    peer-to-peertransactions,coordinationandcollaboration.Intheblockchain
    system,noorganizationorindividualcanachievecontrolofglobaldata,and
    anynodestopworkingwillnotaffecttheoveralloperationofthesystem.
    Thisdecentralizednetworkwillgreatlyimprovedatasecurity.
- Immutablemodification:Blockchain usesencryption technologytoverify
    andstoredata,andusesdistributedconsensusalgorithmstoaddandupdate
    data.Blockchainrequiresnodestoparticipateinverifyingtransactionsand
    generatingblocks;modifyinganydatarequireschangingallsubsequentItis
    extremelydifficulttorecordandmodifythedataofasinglenode.
- Openness,transparencyandtraceability:thewrittenblockcontentwillbe
    backeduptoeachnode,eachnodehasthelatestcompletedatabasecopy
    andallrecordinformationispublic,anyonecanquerythroughthepublic
    interfaceBlockdata.Eachtransactionintheblockchainissolidifiedintothe
    blockdata through chain storage, andat the same time,alltransaction
    records of all blocks are processed by superimposing HASH summary
    processingthroughcryptographicalgorithms,soitcanbetracedbacktoany
    transactionhistory.
- Collectivemaintainability:Thedecentralizationoftheblockchaindetermines
    itscollectivemaintainability.Traditionalcentralizedinstitutionsusuallyhave
    threeroles:datastore,datamanager,anddataanalyst.Theblockchain is
    maintainedbyallpartiesinareciprocalmanner,andeachpartyhasclear
    rightsandresponsibilities,andthereisnoneedtoreporttoathird-party


```
organization.Transferrightsandrealizejointcooperation.
```
Atpresent,theblockchainisregardedbymanylargeorganizationsasamajor
breakthrough technologythatcompletelychangesthebusinessandeven
theoperationmodeoftheorganization.Inthefieldsoffinance,Internetof
Things,charity,medicalandhealth,agriculture,supplychain,environmental
protection,etc.,moreandmoreenterprisesare beginningtoexplorethe
applicationprospectsofblockchainintheindustry,andplandatacirculation
routesbasedonblockchaintechnologypicture.

Specifictothefieldofenvironmentalprotection,blockchaintechnologyhas
hugeadvantages.

- The use of blockchain technologycan complete the construction ofan
    autonomousrenewableresourcecollaborationplatformandbuildaglobal
    collaborative sharingplatform.Throughdigitaltoken mining,everyoneis
    encouragedtotaketheinitiativetoparticipateinthecauseofenvironmental
    protection and solve the difficult problems ofenvironmental protection,
    therebyhelpingtheworldtoreduceenvironmentalpollution.
- Usethedistributed,trustworthy,andnon-tamperableblockchaintorecord
    the relevant data of all renewable resources, covering the complete
    informationofalllinksofenvironmentalprotectionundertakingsandpublic
    welfare,andthenhaveanaccurateassessmentofthevalueofthegoodsfor
    transactions. The blockchain encryption algorithm creates secure
    transactions,which canbeusedtosendandreceivedigitalassets,realize
    directandfasttransfers,andensuretransactionsecurity.
- Useblockchaindistributed,trustworthy,andnon-tamperabletorecordall
    relevantdataofenvironmentallyfriendlyrenewableresources,includingthe
    completeinformationofitemsfromrawmaterialprocurement,toprocessing
    andproduction,totransportationandsales,totheuseofscrap,andsoon.
    Thevalueoftheitemisaccuratelyjudgedtofacilitatethetransaction.The
    blockchainencryption algorithmcreatessecuretransactions.Theplatform
    canbeusedtosendandreceivedigitalassets,realizedirectandfasttransfers,
    andensuretransactionsecurity.


### 1 4 ThebirthoftheEPTproject..............................................................................................

To be precise, "blockchain +" should be "blockchain and Internet
+"."Blockchain +"is basedon the existingInternet,multi-center,decentralized,
self-organized,datasharingtrustednetwork,comparedwiththepure"Internet+"
mode,wethinkthemostimportantdifferenceisthatthe"Internet+"isthechange
ofproductivity,andthe"blockchain+"isthechangeofproductionrelations!

Blockchaincansolvetheproblemofinformationasymmetry,eliminatemany
intermediatelinks,andclearlydividetherightsandresponsibilitiesofallpartiesto
theecosystem.Underareasonableincentivemechanism,blockchaincanpromote
all parties to cooperate spontaneously, change the mutual relationship in the
productionprocess,andformalargecooperationnetwork,whichbringsendless
imagination space.In addition,blockchain technologycan better protect users'
privacy.The"Internet+"moderequiresuserstograntcredittodatatoInternet
enterprises,whichareoftenanalyzed,usedorevensoldbyInternetcompaniesto
taptheirtrafficandvalue.Thesebehaviorsdonotevenneedtopasstheconsentof
users.Blockchainusesasymmetricencryption,authorizationandmoretechnologies,
whichcanonlybeaccessedbythedataowner,whichsolvesthisproblemwell.

Atthesametime,wecanseethattoday'sworldinresponsetoclimatechange,
havemadeasolemncommitment,atthesametimeinvariouswaystopromotethe
sustainable developmentofmanyprojects,especiallyincarbontrading,carbon
tradingis topromoteglobal greenhouse gas emissions,reduceglobal carbon
dioxideemissionsmarketmechanism,energystructureoptimization,newenergy
technologyisa lotofadoptedand developedcountrieslow energyefficiency,
emission reduction space, low cost in sharp contrast.Thisdirectly leads tothe
differentcostofthesameemissionreductionindifferentcountries,formingaprice
difference.Thiscreatesacarbontradingmarket.

Fortheabovereasons,wehavecreatedtheEPT(fullnameofEnvironment
ProtectionToken)project,aimingtoimprovethestatusquoofglobalwarmingand
environmental pollution, and to create new development opportunities for
environmentalprotectionundertakings.


# chapter II

# Overview of the EPT

# project


### 2 1 EPTProjectIntroduction....................................................................................................

EPT,itsfullnameisEnvironmentProtectionToken,whichmeansenvironmental
protection.Ourvisionistouseblockchaintechnologytopromoteenvironmental
protection,garbageclassification,andreduceenvironmentalpollution.

EPTisbuildingtheworld'stopenvironmentalchain,willthroughblockchain
technologytosolvethestorageandprocessingofenvironmentalprotectiondata,
throughEPTgenerateddigitalassetstoestablishthe"Token"incentivemechanism,
for people's garbage classification and environmental protection behavior, to
provide substantialincentives toencouragehundreds of millions of people to
participatein the activities againstenvironmentaldeterioration.Asmorepeople
participateintheenvironmentalprotectionchainEPTecology,EPTwillpromotethe
continuousimprovementoftheglobalecologicalenvironment,andpeoplewill
enjoyamoresuperiorlivingenvironment.

EPTbelievesthatthetransactionsoftensofthousandsofblockchainprojects
across platforms and theircumbersome,efficiencyandinferiority,so thatuser
traffic cannot beexchangedand sharedbetween cross-platforms,thus directly
leading tothelack of breadth and depth ofblockchain applications.EPT takes
solvingtheproblemsofthetraditionalenvironmentalprotection industryasits
own responsibility, and is committed to providing new solutions for the
environmental protection industry, and providing an exclusive environmental
protection communityplatformfor environmentalprotection enthusiasts.Atthe
sametime,blockchaintechnologyisadoptedtosolvetheplatformrestrictionsof
users,getthroughthelimitationsofeachplatform,realizecross-platformpayment,
cross-platform application, jointly build blockchain environmental protection
alliance, and realize community exchange, payment exchange, technology
unification andtraffic sharing.In addition,EPT willalso connectthrough offline
entityandonlinevirtualrealitytechnology,leteveryoneanytimeandanywhere
convenient use ofEPT,rich blockchain technologyanddigital currencyoffline
entityandonline environmentalprotection chain swim,mallsystem,borrowing
plate, the plate, and other application scenarios, promote its service in new
environmentalprotectionindustryprogressandsocialdevelopment.


ThecommercialimplementationofEPTwillcooperatewiththegovernment
andsocialorganizationstodoiteffectively,actingasapowerfultooltoestablisha
globalunifiedmarketandbuildanecologicalcivilizationsociety.Therefore,EPTis
basedoninternationalconsensusandinternationalbehavior,notapersonoran
organization of unilateral behavior, can help enterprises more convenient
self-regulationandimprovethemodeofproduction,tohelpthegovernmentmore
effectively regulate and guide enterprises and individuals, help environmental
publicwelfareforcesremovetrustconcerns,aggregatethewholesocietyofthe
environmentalprotectionforceinthesamedirection,createagreenearth.

Inordertoachievetheabovegoals,intechnology,EPTrelyingoncurrencyAnn
intelligentchainBSC,buildapracticalglobalenvironmentalprotectionblockchain
infrastructure,ageneral,supportfunction,highperformance,easytouse,good
user experience,scalable basedon strengtheningthemapof directionalblock
chain 4. 0 infrastructure,tosupportallkindsofchainapplicationblockchain 4. 0
ecosystem.

Intermsoftheprojectgovernancestructure,EPTisnotasystemunderthe
controlofacertaincompanyororganization,butexertingthedecentralizedvalues
ofblockchain,andcombiningtheDAOgovernanceformundertheDeFimodeto
complete the project governance.The advantage of blockchain distributed
autonomous community created by DeFi field lies in the openness and
transparencythat cannotbe tamperedwith.EPT will promote the progressof
blockchainindustryandthefurtherdevelopmentofpublicwelfareundertakingsof
garbageclassificationandenvironmentalprotection,andaspiretobuildtheworld's
largestDeFifieldinternationalization

### 2 2 EPTenvironmentalprotectionsolutions.......................................................................

With thesupportofthefull-stacktechnicalarchitectureofBinanintelligent
chain,EPThasasuperexchangeprotocoltosupportdecentralizedapplications
with practical commercial value. Developers around the world can develop
payment,transaction,settlement,gamesandotherapplications.

Based on blockchain technology, EPT can create a global block industry
applicationscenariowithenvironmentalprotectionasthecoreextension,suchas


environmental protection industry development, environmental protection
communitydevelopment,environmentalprotectionactivities,garbage recycling,
garbage treatment, garbage traceability, etc.; extension industry such as the
realizationofentertainmentmallanduserpaymentindustrydata,whichindustries
includebutnotlimitedtochain tourentertainment,financiallending,payment,
mall,crowdfunding,etc.Liketheapplicationmodelofbuildingblocks,adoptglobal
business data,step bystep digital toblockchain, so as toform akingdom of
commercialassets.

EPTcanprovidevaluemediaintheenvironmentalprotectionindustry,withEPT
tokensasthetradingmedia,torealizethecirculationofonlineservices,soasto
solvethetraditionalpainpointsoftheindustry.Atthesametime,wewilldevelop
commercial scenarios to solve the fundamental problems of price chaos and
difficult to distinguish between true and false, and ensure that information
circulation and transactions are open and fair.In the trading environment of
commercial service products, users can pay for the commercial products and
servicesofthemallthroughEPT,andsharetheecology,sourceandinformationof
resources.

EPT will use the distributed technology of blockchain to promote green
environmental protection into every community that is troubled by pollution
problems,andbringdistributedwastemanagementandrecyclingtechnologyto
our ordinary people, and contribute to the construction of green ecological
community.Atthesametime,everytransactionintheEPTplatformhasapublic
welfare contribution. The mission of EPT is not only to create a green and
environmentalprotectionenvironment,butalsotobuildamutualaidandpublic
welfareplatform.Similarly,withthehelpofblockchaintechnology,EPTsystemon
thebasisoftheInternet,toallkindsofmajorenvironmentalproblems,helpthe
general public improve environmental habits, establish energy saving
consciousness, reduce enterprise "three waste" emissions, improve waste
regeneration efficiency, and can comprehensive monitoring, analysis of allthe
known, valuable energy use, resource recycling, waste regeneration, and the
importantdataofglobalecologicalchange.

Ontheincentiveway,wewillissueEPTtoken,toencourageeconomicmodelof
alltheparticipants,drivetheexistingenvironmentaleconomicbusinessmodelof
digital,certification,assetchain,solvetheproblemofbusinessmodelinnovation,
andasanopportunitytodriveusers,merchantsandplatformbetweentripartite
win-win,letmorepeople,institutions,enterprisesandothersharingtechnology


developmentbringsconvenienceanddividends.LeteveryparticipantintheEPT
economic value chain must get long-term developmentopportunities,so that
every user and organization can effectively integrate into the whole layer of
environmental protection economy, and obtain more value benefits through
practicingtheconceptofgreenenvironmentalprotection.

In addition, EPT will also open a special environmental protection public
welfare fund,aiming topromote thedevelopmentofenvironmental protection
undertakings globally,through environmental protection activities,tomakethe
awarenessofenvironmentalprotectiondeeplyrootedintheheartsofthepeople,
andtostriveforthesustainabledevelopmentoftheenvironment.Eachtransaction
ofEPTwillparticipateinapublicwelfarepart,andacertainproportionoffundswill
bedrawntoholdenvironmentalpublicwelfareactivities.Throughenvironmental
publicwelfareactivities,itwillpublicizeenvironmentalawarenessandcreateEPT
environmentalpublicwelfareproducts

### 2 3 EPTbasictechnologysystem...........................................................................................

Intheearlystage,withthesupportofBinanintelligentchain,theEPTsystem
hasaTuring-completede-centerdatabaseandanopenenvironmentalprotection
data through the API interface.The EPT system can accommodate the existing
global environmental protection resource exchanges, digital asset circulation
platform,environmentalprotectionapplication institutions,etc.,formingablock
ecological platform with the landing of environmental protection application
solutionsasthecore,extendingtheapplicationofotherofflineentityindustriesin
theenvironmentalprotection industryandtheonlinecirculationandtradingof
environmentalprotectionassets.

```
1 )Technicalapplicationsystem
```
- Decentralization:MakeeverythingintheEPTecosystemoriginatefromusers
    and nodes, and based on the core chain of the EPT ecosystem, make
    environmentalprotectiontraceableandreturnenvironmentalprotectionto
    everyone.


- Distributedaccountingandstorage:toensuretheauthenticity,completeness
    andtraceabilityoftheofflineenvironmentalprocessinginformationofthe
    EPTecosystem.
- Anti-tamperingtechnology:innon-ecologicalorabnormalsituations,such
    aswhentheincreaseinenvironmentalprotectiondataisnotproportionalto
    the decrease in effective energy, prevent or eliminate the interaction of
    materialfloworinformationflow.
- Anonymitysystem:AllowalldataandinformationintheEPTecosystemtobe
    transformed into each other under the state of blockchain technology
    encryption.EachconverteddatainformationhasauniqueidentificationID,
    including data information generation, use, verification, storage and
    verification,etc.,whichisconvenientforothersystemsintheecosystemor
    outsidethesystemtocall.
- Valuetransfer:Offlineenvironmentalprotectionprocessinginformationand
    dataintheEPTecosystemcanallbetransformedintoeachother,exchange
    value,andmakefulluseofit.

**2 )EPTcharacteristics**

ThroughtheEPTsystem,itcanprovideenvironmentalprotectionsupportersin
avarietyofenvironmentalprotectionapplicationscenarios,whileproviding
unified management of multi-blockchain assets, realizing transaction
application payment interoperability, technology unification, and flow
sharing.Ithasthefollowingcharacteristics:

- One-stopmanagement:EPTmanagesmultipledigitalcurrenciesinaunified
    platform,notonlysupportsthestorageandmanagementofmainstream
    assets such as Bitcoin and Ethereum, but also supports the standard
    protocolsofsmartcontractplatformssuchasEthereum,andquicklyexpands
    basedoneachplatformStorageandmanagementservicesofissuedtokens.
- Multiple security guarantees: EPT provides multiple signature technical
    guaranteesandtwo-stepauthorizationverificationforplatformdigitalasset
    management.Userscanchoosetoperformfingerprintandliveverification
    methodsduringservicetransactionstoensurethesecurityofuserassetsin
    allaspects.


- Multi-language support: EPT supports multiple languages ​ ​ in
    mainstreamdigitalcurrencymarketssuchasChinese,English,Japanese,and
    Korean,and is suitable for the transaction needs of people in different
    countries and different languages ​ ​ in different scenarios, creating
    multi-nationalinteroperability,and creatingworld-class carbon emissions
    Theexchangeplatformapplicationclearslanguagebarriers.
- Digitalcurrency exchange andtrading:EPT usesthedistributed storage
    technology of the blockchain tocreate EPT's original exchange network,
    which comprehensively upgrades the security level of EPT's trading
    environment; docks with the API of internationalexchanges, and always
    feedbacksthelatestinformation on internationalmainstreamcurrencies,
    Which truly embodies the characteristicsofblockchain transactions, and
    providesuserswithsimple,convenientandsafeexchangeandtransaction
    services.
- Risk-freecurrencyexchange:EPTdevelopsanexchangenetworkbasedon
    theBinancesmartchainsmartcontract,andrealizesrisk-freedigitalcurrency
    exchange services through smart contracts and chain gateways and
    cross-smart contract technologies. Users exchange digital currencies
    throughEPT.Platformpartiesorotherthirdpartiescreatesmartcontractsfor
    exchange. The contract mechanism monitors andexecutesthe exchange
    process,avoidingtheriskofdefaultbyallpartiesinvolvedinthetransaction.
    Compared with centralized platform services, smart contracts avoid the
    subjectiveriskofdefault orobjectiveattackson theplatformand bring
    lossestousers.Even fortokensissuedbynewprojectsintheblockchain
    industry, as long as the EPT platform supports it, risk-free exchange
    transactionscanbecarriedoutthroughtheexchangeplatformservices.On
    theEPTchain,therearestandardvariousdigitalassetexchangeservices,and
    variousdigitalassetscanbefreelyexchanged.
- Simpleandconvenienttrading:Therearecertainentrybarriersandlearning
    costs to buyandselldigitalcurrencies through exchanges.EPTprovides
    userswiththebestmarketpriceandsimpleoperationexperiencethrough
    thedockingexchangeAPI.Throughtheoptimizedscreeningmechanism,EPT
    presentsuserswith simplebuyingand sellingprices.Users onlyneedto
    enter the quantity tobe like Complete transactions as easilyas on the
    e-commerceplatform.


### 2 4 ValuecreationoftheEPT..................................................................................................

Inadditiontotheenvironmentalsector,EPTwillalsomakefulluseinthesupply
chain,shoppingmall,chaintravel,lending,crowdfunding,payment,datasecurity,
andconsumerentertainment.

```
1 )Paymentsystemwilleffectivelyreducepaymentcosts
```
The decentralized feature of EPT will provide technical support for
multi-scenariopayments.Asanintermediarybetweenthebuyerandtheseller,the
third-partypaymentplatformwilltemporarilyreservemoneyandchargeaservice
fee(about 2 - 3 %)foreachtransactiontoestablishaseller’sreputationevaluation
system.ThenewpaymentsystembasedonEPTcanrealizedirecttransactions.The
transactionisbasedoncryptographicprinciplesandnotbasedontrust,sothatany
partieswhoreachanagreementcandirectlypayforthetransactionwithoutthe
participationofathirdparty,savingallparties’ fees.

```
2 )Buildacompleteblockchainsupplychainsystem
```
E-commerceisacomplexstructurethatiscomposedoflogistics,information
flow,and capital flow,and connects suppliers,manufacturers, distributors, and
usersintheindustry.EPTisbasedonblockchaintechnologyandcanbeusedasa
large-scalecollaborationtooltoadapttosupplychainmanagement.Inthesupply
chain,manytypesofdatacanbetransmittedthroughtheblockchain,including
insurance,invoices,consignmentandtransportation,andbillsoflading.

```
3 )Basedonblockchaintechnologytoeffectivelyrealizedatasecurity
```
Intheenvironment-friendlytransactionscenario,theuser'spersonaldataand
payment data are stored in one of the few centralized databases after being
handedovertotheplatformorcompany.Thismakesthesecentralizeddatabases
easytobecomethetargetofmaliciousattacks,andtheriskofdataleakageishigh.
Therefore,switchingtotheEPTdecentralizedsystemeliminatestheneedtostore
the personal data and payment data of tens of millions of users, allowing
consumerstostoreandcontroltheirowndatainthisdecentralizedsystem,thereby
eliminatingtheneedPotentialdataleakagerisk.


**4 ) Drive transaction transparency and build a trusted future for
environmentalprotection**

The opacityof the transaction process is the biggest problem facing the
platform now. EPT can improve the transparency of the transaction, thereby
promotingtrust.Everytransaction isrecordedinasharedledgerandcannotbe
modifiedbyanyone.Shareddistributedledgersprovidesecurity,transparency,and
traceability.Therefore,EPT will effectivelydrive thetransparencyofthe various
processesofenvironmentallyfriendlybusinesstransactionsandestablishaneraof
trustinthesharingeconomy.

### 2 5 WhychooseBSCasthebottomofthesystem...........................................................

BINANCESMARTCHAIN,referredtoasBSC,isamainchaininthedualpublic
chainmechanismofBinance,theworld'slargestdigitalcurrencyexchange.BSCcan
beregardedasablockchainparalleltoBinanceChain.ItmainlyservestheBinance
DeFiecosystem,andatthesametimemakesBinance'sdualpublicchainmodel
morecomplete.

BSChas acertain innovation in the consensusalgorithm.Ituses thePoSA
(ProofofStakeAuthority)consensusalgorithm,whichcombinesthefunctionsof
theDelegatedProofofStake(DPoS)andProofofAuthority(PoA)mechanism,and
isbuilton anetworkof 21 verificationnodes,Thesecond-levelblocktimecan
establishahigh-speedinfrastructurefortheDeFiprotocol.

ThewordsmartinBSCisreflectedinthefunctionsrelatedtosmartcontracts:
BSC supports smart contract writing functions, compatible with the existing
EthereumvirtualmachineEVM(EthereumVirtualMachine)andallapplicationsand
toolsunderitsecosystem,Developerscaneasilyimplementthemigration and
deploymentofEthereumDApp,savingdevelopmenteffort.Finally,asaparallel
chainthatcaninteractwithBC,BSCnativelysupportscross-chaincommunication
andtransactions.Overall,thetechnicaladvantagesofBSCaremoreobvious,which
arereflectedinthefollowingaspects:

- Smartcontracts.BSChasthefunctionofwritingsmartcontracts.DAppswith


different functions are the basic elements of the DeFi ecosystem, and smart
contractsrepresenttheunderlyingrulesandoperatinglogicofDApps.Atthesame
time,theprogrammabilitygreatlyincreasesthescalabilityofBSCandrealizesthe
diversificationofDAppfunctions.Therefore,smartcontractsarethecornerstoneof
theBinanceDeFiecological"building".

- CompatiblewithEVM.BSCiscompatiblewiththeexistingEthereumVirtual
Machine(EVM)andallapplicationsandtoolsunderitsecosystem,whichgreatly
reduces thethreshold for developerstodevelopDApps.Developers can easily
implementthemigrationanddeploymentofEthereumDApp,savingdevelopment
effort.ThesignificanceofcompatibilitywithEVMisthatitcanbecompatiblewith
the current hottest Ethereum ecosystem to the greatest extent, attracting
developersandtheoverflowoffundsonEthereum.
- Cross-chainfunction.Thesignificanceofcross-chainistoenrichthecurrency
oftheDeFiecosystemandincreaseliquidity.Uptonow,Binance’s “TokenCanal”
hascompletedthedevelopmentofBTC,ERC 20 onEthereum(ETH,LINK,USDT,DAI,
etc.), XRP, BCH, LTC, ADA, DOT, XTZ, BSC,ONT and other assets. Cross-chain
interoperability.ThismeansthattheseassetscanbemigratedtotheBinanceSmart
ChainandbecomeliquidityforDEFIoperations.

Basedontheabovereasons,wechoseBSCasthebasicchainforEPTissuance.
BSCwillcreate moreimaginable space forthesystem construction of theEPT
platformandthecompatibilityofcross-chainecology.


## ChapterIIIEPTSystemArchitectureSystem.........................................................................


### 3 1 EPTTheunderlyingsystemarchitecture.......................................................................

WiththesupportofBSCpublicchaintechnology,EPTdevelopsitsownsystem
architecturewithsixlayersofdatalayer,networklayer,consensuslayer,incentive
layer,contractlayer,andapplicationlayer.

```
1 )Datalayer
```
Based on the high redundancy storage mechanism of the blockchain,
blockchainstoragehasacertainimpactonthescalabilityandperformanceofthe
blockchain.TheEPTframeworkisdesignedwithamulti-levelnodesystem,and
differentstorage optionsareselectedaccordingtodifferentnode applications.
Strategy(distributedaccounting).

```
2 )Networklayer
```
P 2 P Protocol (P 2 P Protocol) supports the data transmission and signaling
exchange of each node in the blockchain network. It is an important
communicationguaranteefordatadistributionorconsensusmechanism.TheEPT
systemdesignsupportsmultipleP 2 Pprotocols,communicationmechanismsand
serializationmechanisms.Accordingtodifferentscenarios,flexibleprotocolusage
isrequired.Intermsofcommunicationsecurity,itflexiblysupportsprotocolssuch
asHTTPS,TLS,andWSS.Ontheneedtoestablishexternalserviceinterfacesfor
platform applications, it can be extended to support OAuth authentication
integration.

```
3 )Consensuslayer
```
TheEPTconsensusalgorithmisdividedintotwostages.Inversion 1. 0 ofEPT,
theconsensusmechanismusedbyEPTisatwo-layerconsensusmechanismthat
combinesbasicDAGconsensusandBA-VRFconsensus.StartingfromtheEPT 2. 0
version,thebasic DAGconsensuswill be replacedbythe HashNet-based DAG
consensus.TheEPTconsensusmechanismisatwo-layerconsensusmechanism
thatcombinestheHashNetDAGconsensusandtheBA-VRFconsensusmechanism.
Therefore,EPThasthecharacteristicsofhighperformanceandhighconsistency,
which is suitable for financial payment, digital transaction data is frequently
generated, and weak central upper-level applications with high real-time
accountingrequirements.


```
4 )Incentivelayer
```
EPT not only has airdrops for creation consensus rewards, but also liquid
miningpoolsforlong-termnetworkvaluemaintenance.BecauseofEPT'sunique
consensusmechanism,performanceisnotaffectedbythenumberofnodes,so
EPT'sconsensusnodes do notsetan upper limit,andit happensdynamically,
anyonecanjointoearnrewardsatanytime.

```
5 )Contractlayer
```
For each smart contract, as an EPTfinancial assetoperation full life cycle
management,completeandcontrollableprocessmanagementofthesubmission,
deployment, use,and cancellation ofsmartcontracts, andintegratedauthority
managementmechanismforeachoperationofthesmartcontractThismechanism
carriesoutcomprehensivesafetymanagement.

```
6 )Applicationlayer
```
The application layer will provide general transaction protocols, support
multi-language integration and function expansion, and support multiple
languages​ ​ suchasJava,JavaScript,Python,etc.,andisfullyapplicabletoEPT
networkexpansion.


### 3 2 AnonymouscommunicationtechnologybasedonP 2 P..........................................

```
TheEPTunderlyingcommunication networkadoptsaP 2 Parchitecture,and
then an anonymous accessmechanismbetween nodesisadded to it to
ensure the privacyprotection ofinformation services.EPT's P 2 P network
anonymouscommunicationismainlyrealizedinthefollowingways:
```
- Run a proxy server on this machine. This proxy server periodically
    communicateswithotherEPTsandmaintainsaTLSlinktoformavirtuallink
    in the EPT network. Specifically,each user runs its own agent program:
    obtains the directory,establishes the path,and handles the connection.
    TheseagentsacceptTCPdatastreamsandmultiplexthemonthesameline.
- EPTisencryptedattheapplicationlayer,andthetransmissionbetweeneach
    relaynode is encrypted with apoint-to-point keytoform ahierarchical
    structure. All the nodes passingby it wrap the client in it, so that the
    communication security can be maintained between the relay nodes.
    Specifically,eachEPTrelaynodemaintainsalong-termverificationkeyanda
    short-termsessionkey.TheverificationkeyisusedtosigntheTLScertificate,
    signtherelaynode'sdescriptor,andisalsousedbythedirectoryserverto
    signthedirectory.Thesessionkeyisusedtodecodetherequestsentbythe
    userinordertoestablishapathwhilenegotiatingatemporarykey.TheTLS
    protocolalsousesashort-termconnectionkeybetweenthecommunicating
    relaynodes,whichchangesperiodicallyandindependentlytoreducethe
    impactofkeyleakage.
- The data packets in the EPT networkuse random pathsto cover their
    footprints,sothattheobserveratacertainpointdoesnotknowwherethe
    data really comes from and where the real destination is. The client
    incrementallyestablishesanencryptedlineintheEPTnetwork.Thislineonly
    expandsonehopatatime,andtherelaynodethatexpandseachtimeonly
    knowswhichrelaynodethedatacomesfromandwhichrelaynodethedata
    willbesentto.Norelaynodeknowstheentireline.Theclientnegotiatesa
    setofindependentkeyswitheachhoptoensurethateachhopcannottrack
    therelaypointithaspassed.Oncealineisestablished,itcanbeusedfor
    dataexchange.


TherationaleoftheanonymouscommunicationnetworkfortheEPTisshown
inthefigureabove.Thedirectoryserveristhecoreofitsnetwork,collectingrelay
nodeinformationinEPTnetworkandpublishingtoEPTagentsasnodesnapshots
andnodedescription;relaynodesarethebasisoftheEPTnetwork;anonymous
communication traffic in the network is forwarded through anonymous
communicationlinkscomposedofmultiplerelaynodes;theagentrunsonEPTuser
andisresponsibleforestablishinganonymouslinksandtransferringnetworktraffic
betweenuser'snetworkapplicationandEPTanonymouslinks.Inthefigure,anEPT
anonymouscommunicationlinkisformedbythreerelaynodesthatareentrance,
middleandexitpositionsaccordingtotheirpositions.

### 3 3 EPTunderlyingdatastructure..........................................................................................

```
1 ）BasicDAGdatastructure
```
TheEPTusestheunderlyingDAGstructuretostorethetransaction datain
Phase 1 .Atpresent,severalprojectssuch asIOTAandByteballhavesuccessfully
usedDAGtobuildpublicchainswithstableoperationofDAG,provingthetechnical
advancementandperformanceofDAGchain.InEPT,transactioninformationis
encapsulatedintounits(Unit)andcombinedintoaDAGdiagram.Becausetheunit
canbelinkedtoanyoneormorethanbeforetheunit,donotneedtopaymore
computingcostandtimecostforconsensusproblem,alsodonothavetowaitfor
strongdatasynchronizationbetweennodes,noteventheconceptofmultipledata
unit assembly block, so can greatly improve the transaction, and reduce the
confirmationtimetoaminimum.


The DAG data structure of EPT is shown in the figure. The directed edge
betweentheunitsindicatesthatthereisareferencerelationshipbetweenthetwo
units.Inthefigure,thereisadirectededgefromBtoA,whichmeansthatBrefers
toA,andAistheparentofB.Unit,BisachildunitofA.Atthesametime,wecall
unitCindirectlyrefertoA,whichistheancestorunitofC;unitGdoesnothaveany
parentunit,whichiscalledthecreationunit,andthecreationunitisunique;unitX,
Ydoesnothaveanysub-units,thistypeofunitiscalledthetopunit.

Theunitiscomposedoftwoparts:theunitheaderandtheunitmessage.The
unitheadermainlycontainsthefollowingfields:

- Unitversion;
- Tokenidentifier;
- Signature ofunitcreator:a singlesignature or acommon signatureby
multiplecreators;
- Parentunithash:thehashofthereferencedsingleormultipleparentunits;
- Witnesslist:thehashofotherunits(usuallytheparentunitorancestorunit)
withthesamewitness.

The unit message part is used to store transaction information. EPT has
multipletypesoftransactions,includingpayment,datastorage,voting,andsoon.
Similartothefactthat each new blockin the blockchain needstoconfirmall
previousblocks,eachnewchildunitintheDAGneedstoconfirmitsparentunit,
andallparentunitsoftheparentunit.Ifyoutrytomodifythepastrecordsinthe
EPT,youneedtocoordinatewithalargeandgrowingnumberofotherusers,most
of whom are anonymous strangers. Therefore, immutability is based on the
complexity of coordinating with such a large number of strangers who have
difficultyreachingagreement,arenotinterestedincooperation,andeveryonecan
vetorevisions.Aftertheunitisreleased,theconfirmationstartsimmediately,and
theconfirmationcancomefromanewunitreleasedbyanyoneatanytime.Users
helpeachother:byaddinganewunit,thepublisheralsoconfirmsallprevious
units.


```
2 ）TheHashNetdatastructurebasedontheenhancedDAG
```
HashNetisadirectedacyclicgraph(DAG)composedofnumerousverticesand
connectedvertices.asshowninthefigure.

Thegraphrecordsatwhattimeandinwhatorderallnodessendtoother
nodesinthewholenetwork,andeach node hasacopyofsuch aHashNetin
memory.Inthefigureabove,therearefivecomputernodesA,B,C,D,andE,each
havingacolumnwiththevertexvertex(alsocalledevent)placed.Thelatestevent,
willbeplacedatthetopofthefigure,HashNetisupthe overtime.

### 3 4 Tradeanonymousprotection...........................................................................................

EPT ensures anonymous protection of transaction information from two
aspects of unrelated and untraceable nature of transactions, and constantly
iteratively improves anonymous protection capabilities.EPT standardizes the
definitionoftransaction unaffiliatedunlinkabilityanduntraceableuntraceablility.
Unaffiliatedmeansthatforanytwoexternaltransactions,itcannotbeprovedtobe
senttothesameperson,anduntraceablemeansthatallpossiblesendersareequal
inprobabilityforeachinternaltransaction.

```
Uncorrelation and untracker are properties that a blockchain with strong
```

privacyprotection mustsatisfy,andEPTachievessupportforuncorrelation and
untracker by adopting one-key one-time secret key and ring signature ring
signaturetechnologies.Atthesametime,EPTdesignsandimplementsarigorous
zero-knowledgeproofofthezero-knowledgeproofmodelasaselectablefunction
tofurtherenhancetransactionanonymity.

```
1 )Onetimekey
```
EPTusesone-timekeytechnologytorealizetheunrelatednessoftransactions.
One-timekeymeansthatthesenderusesaseparatekeytosigneachtransaction.
Unlikeanormalblockchaintransaction,thereceiveronlyusesapairofpublicand
privatekeys.Inakeyscheme,thereceiverneedstousetwopairsofpublicand
privatekeysineachtransaction.Whenthetransactionisinitiated,thetransaction
senderusesthetransactionacceptanceThetwopublickeysandrandomnumbers
ofthepartygenerateatemporarypublickey.Thesenderusesthetemporarykeyas
anaddressfortransactions.ThereceiverperformsaDiue-Hellmanexchangeand
combinesoneofhisprivatekeyinformationtoobtainthetemporaryprivatekey.

Sincetheone-timekeycanonlybeverifiedbytherecipient,thecorrectnessof
thetransactionisguaranteed.Atthesametime,eachtransactionusesadifferent
randomnumber.Evenifmultipletransactionsareperformedwiththesamereceiver,
theycannotbeassociatedbecauseofdifferentprimarykeys,whichensuresthe
non-relevanceofthetransaction.

```
2 )Ringsignature
```
Theone-timekeymainlyguaranteestheprivacyofthetransactionreceiver.In
ordertoensuretheprivacyofthetransactionsenderatthesametime,Internet
usesringsignaturetechnology.Ringsignatureisamulti-usersignaturetechnology
derived from group signature technology. This signature gets rid of many
drawbacksofgroupsignatures,suchasnolongerrequiringgroupadministrators
anduntraceability.

Intheringsignaturetechnology,themessageissignedbyagroupofsigners,
and the verifier cannot know who the specific signer is. Therefore, the ring
signaturecansolvetheproblemofprivacyprotectionofthesigner'sidentityand
realizetheuntraceabilityoftransactions.Ontheotherhand,sincethegeneralring
signaturetechnologyhidesthesigneramongagroupofusers,itwillcausedouble
spending(doublespending).Thelinkableringsignaturetechnologycanbeusedto


solvethisproblem.

```
3 )Zeroknowledgeproof
```
Thezero-knowledgeprooftechnologywasproposedbyS.Goldwasser,S.Micali
andC.Rackouin 1985 .Itwasoriginallydesignedtoallowtheverifiertocorrectly
authenticatetheverifierwithoutprovidinganyusefulinformation totheverifier.
thegoalof.

Zero-knowledgeproofisessentiallyaninteractiveproofsystemthatintroduces
randomnessandinteraction elementsintotraditionalmathematical proofs,and
usesquestion-and-answermethodsforproof.Later,non-interactivemethodshave
beendeveloped,whichhasaprofoundimpactinthefieldsofcomputerscienceand
cryptography.In practical applications, zero-knowledge proofrequiresthat the
verifier cannot obtain new knowledge duringthe verificationprocess,that is,a
maliciousverifier,whichmakesverificationerrorsandpreventsverificationerrors
causedbytechnology.

TheencrypteddigitalcurrencyZcashuseszero-knowledgeproofforthefirst
timetorealizetheprivacyofitstransactions.Itisdifferentfromthewaythatthe
sender’stransactionblockisdeleted.Zcashusesavoidlisttoidentifytheblock
sentbythetrader,andabsenteeismonlyverifiesthetransactionblock.Thehash
valueof,realizesthecompleteanonymityofthetransaction.

```
4 )Anonymoustransactionsandprivacyprotection
```
Asablockchaininnovation technology,EPTrealizesanonymoustransactions
andprivacyprotectionthroughconfidentialtransactions.Version 1. 0 to 3. 0 ofEPT
draw on theprivacyprotection methodsofmultiple cryptocurrencies, anduse
one-timekeyandringsignaturetechnologytorealizeconfidentialtransactions..

The latestversionofEPT drawson thecurrentZcash anonymityprotection
method,addsastrictlydesignednon-interactivezero-knowledgeproofbasedon
thepreviousversion,takesnon-interactivezero-knowledgeproofasanoptional
function, supports the realization of complete anonymity of transactions, and
effectively resists malicious verifiers , Tomeetthe privacy protection needs of
differentapplicationscenarios.


### 3 5 Smartcontract......................................................................................................................

Blockchaintechnologyprovidesasafeandreliableexecutionenvironmentfor
smart contracts, contributing to the implementation of the smart contract
concept.Smartcontractsareevent-driven,stateandrunonareplicable,shareable
ledgerandcapableofkeepingassetsontheledger,designedtomakeacomplex
setofdigitalcommitmentswithtriggerconditionsproperlyexecutedatthewillof
theparticipants.Smartcontractscannotonlyreceiveandstorevalue,butalsosend
informationandvaluetotheoutsideworld.Thewholeprocesscanbeautomated
andintelligentlyexecutedunderthepremiseofnocenterandnotrust.

Smart contracts are designed to strike a balance between security and
functionality.Theexistingblockchainprojectsmainlyfocusonthedesignofasingle
typeofsmartcontract,seekingabalancebetweensecurityandfunctionalityunder
theconditionsoflimitedtypesofsmartcontracts,andoftenfailingtomeetthe
ideal effect ofmeeting the use experience ofdiversified user groupsandthe
diversified trading needs of users.Bitcoin block chain transaction script is the
prototypeofthesmartcontract,belongstotheTuringcompletesmartcontract,
haslowcomplexityandlightweightadvantages,andin the bitcoinblockchain
network running for nearly ten years, no security problems, but the Bitcoin
transaction verification script support function is very limited, only used for
payment verification.Ethereum block chain support using Solidity advanced
languageofTuringcompleteintelligentcontract,greatlyenrichedthefunctionof
intelligentcontract,expand theapplication ofblockchain technology,butwrite
Ethereumintelligentcontractpronetosecurityvulnerabilities,TheDAOeventis
because of writing Ethereum intelligent contract security vulnerabilities cause
Ethereumcommunitysplit.

EPTadoptsthehierarchicalconceptofsimilarcomputerstoragearchitecturein
theimplementationofsmartcontractfunctions,includingMosesVirtualMachine
(MVM), which supports declarative non-Turing complete smart contracts and
advancedTuringcompletesmartcontracts.Userschoosetousethesetwotypesof
contractsbasedontheuseexperienceandtransactionneeds,balancingcomputing
securityandcomputingfunctionswithcalculationcostsandcomputingcomplexity
tomeetthediversifiedtransactionneeds.Declarativesmartcontractissimpleto
deploy,hashighsecurityandisclosertolegalcontractlanguage;AdvancedTuring


complete smart contract is relatively difficult, mainly used to develop smart
contractwithmorecomplexDAppprogramlogic.Thecommissionmechanismof
the twotypes of smart contracts is different.Thefeeofthe declarative smart
contractiscalculatedaccordingtothebytesoccupiedbythecontract,whilethe
advancedTuringcompletesmartcontracttakestheEPTTokenconsumedwhenthe
programisrunasthefee.

### 3 6 Multiplesupportoftechnology......................................................................................

EPTwillbetheunderlyingAPIofthedevelopmentchainoftheenvironmental
protection data industry and derivatives, realize the docking of application
scenariosandrealizethesuperpositionofdigitalassets,soastosolvetherelevant
practicalproblemsexistingintheenvironmentalprotectionsystem.EPThopesto
buildabridgeapplicationplatformthatcanconnecttotherealworldassets.To
achieve this vision,EPT has made the corresponding layout in the underlying
designandtop-levelapplications.

```
1 )Fasttransactionverificationinseconds
```
Byoptimizingkeylinkssuch assignature algorithm,ledger structure,data
operation,serialization,consensus mechanism, message diffusion, etc.,EPT will
achieve rapid transaction verification in seconds. Meet the user experience of
environmentalprotectionscenariosinmostblockchainapplications.


```
2 )Storageofmassivedata
```
Thedouble-entryaccountingmodeloftheblockchainhasbeencontinuously
usedinthesystem,accumulatingalargeamountofdata,resultinginadecreasein
operatingspeed.EPTwillrealizeaseparatestorageandtablestoragemechanism
torealizemassstorageofdata.

```
3 )Increaseintransactionthroughput
```
Theessenceofblockchainisadistributedsharedaccountingtechnology,and
itsdistributedcharacteristicsaremainlyreflectedindistributedconsistencyrather
thandistributedconcurrentprocessing.Inordertoensuredataconsistencyand
preventtheByzantineGeneralsproblem,certainspecificlinkscanonlybeexecuted
serially,butnotinparallel.Throughlong-termtestingandoptimizationpractices,
the processing performance of EPT will further greatly increase transaction
throughput.

```
4 )Fastsynchronizationofnodedata
```
EPT will develop a mirroring mechanism,which can regularly mirror local
ledgers and implement a convenient rollback mechanism. Under a unified
consensus,mirrortagscanbedesignatedforrollback.Atthesametime,shorten
thecycleofaddingnewnodestojointheoperation,andonlyneedtosynchronize
the latest mirroring and a small number of recent transaction collections to
integrateintothenetworkandparticipateinconsensusverification.

```
5 )Dataaccesscontrolstrategy
```
EPTprovidestwotypesofpermissioncontrolstrategiesfordatainformation
writingandreading.Datainformationwritepermissions,multipleusersaresetup
under the same account, and corresponding permissions are set for different
operations to meet the use scenarios of multi-party signature control. Data
informationreadpermission,userscangrantandrevokesingleuserorusergroup
operationpermissionsondata,andusergroupscanbeflexiblyconfiguredbyusers.
Thedataincludesuseraccountinformation,transactioninformation,etc.,andthe
granularitycanberefinedtoeachattributefieldofthetransactionoraccount.


```
6 )Diversifiedandexpandabledevelopment
```
EPT'sblockchainstructurecanmeettheneedsofdifferentbusinessfieldsand
improvethescalabilityandmaintenanceefficiencyofthesystem.Itcanbeusedto
mark assets and asset transfers, can also provide non-tamperable
multi-dimensionaleventrecords,andcanalsobeusedfortraceabilitytotrackthe
circulationprocessofassets.

```
7 )Multipleprivacyprotection
```
InordertofacilitateuserstouseEPTproductsandservices,inadditiontothe
traditionalclient-sidegenerationandstoragemechanism,EPTalsoprovidestwo
solutions:networkhostingaccessandprivatekeyhardwareaccess(U-key).Web
hostingaccess,thatis,theusernameandpasswordaremappedintoaprivatekey
throughaspecificalgorithmandstoredontheserver.Theprivatekeysstoredon
theserversideareallencrypteddata,andtheprivatekeyscanonlybedecrypted
ontheuserside;thehardwareprivatekeysareusedtomeettheneedsofthe
environmentalprotectionindustry.Atthesametime,itprovidesmultipleprivacy
protectionfunctions.Firstofall,thebottomlayerofEPTprovideshomomorphic
encryption,alluserdataisencryptedandstored,andonlytheusercanseeit.
Secondly,toprovideencryptionmiddlewareservices,userscanchooseaccording
tobusinessneeds.Finally,theupper-levelapplicationcanencryptthedataduring
input, and the EPT is responsible for writingandreading the encrypted data
generatedbytheuser.

```
8 )Visualoperationandmaintenancesupport
```
EPTwillprovidethevisualizationtoolsneededforoperationandmaintenance
management. System monitoring services deployed on EPT nodes: support
business (blocks, transactions,contracts, consensus,etc.), network (networking,
delay,throughput,etc.),systemlevel(CPU,memory,disk,etc.) datainformation
monitoring.Atthesametime,itprovidesacompletelog,alarmandnotification
mechanismtofacilitatethemaintenanceoffinancialcommercialsystems.


## ChapterIVExampleoftheEPTEcologicalPlate...................................................................


### 4 1 Environmentalprotectionclasschaintourapplication............................................

On thebasis ofour technologyandresource accumulation,as wellasthe
integration of blockchain + games and other modes, we will launch EPT
environmentalprotectionchaingamestocreatevalueforglobalecologicaland
environmentalprotection,andleadthenewblockchain+environmentalprotection
+gameexperience.trend.

EPTenvironmentalprotectionchaingameswillplayakeyroleinpromotingthe
development of environmental protection, reducing environmental pollution,
realizingscientificenvironmentalprotectionandinnovativeassettransactionsthat
integratethetokenincentivemodel.Asaglobalecologicalcivilizationconstruction
spacethat uses blockchain technologytosolve the currentpain pointsofthe
environmentalprotectionindustry,intheEPTenvironmentalprotectionchaingame,
the environmentalconditionsofeach areain thevirtualparallel world can be
effectivelymonitoredthroughbigdata,andenvironmentalprotectioncannotbe
tamperedwith.Data,theplatformtokenEPTisusedtoincentivizeenvironmental
protectionbehaviors,andatthesametime,alinkagewithofflineenvironmental
protectionrewardsisformedaccordingtotheamountoftokenholdings.Users
participateinEPTtoachieveenvironmentalprotectionwhilecreatingmorerevenue
value.

EPT will also connect offline entities with online virtual reality technology,
allowingeveryonetoconvenientlyuseEPTtokensanytimeandanywhere,enriching
blockchain technology and digital currency offline entities and online blocks,
self-financing,Supplychain,transaction,paymentandotherapplicationscenarios
promotethedevelopmentofnewenvironmentalprotectionindustries.Inaddition,
theEPTenvironmentalprotectionchaingameperfectlyintegrateselementssuchas
NFT,metauniverseandplaytoearn.Inthegame,youcanachieve:

- CreateafoundationforNFT,MetaverseanddiversifiedEPTenvironmental
protectionchaingamefunctions;
- Assetsarecontrolledbyindividuals, andthrough theapplication ofthe
aggregation toolsprovided bytheEPT platform,moreusers can freelyshuttle


betweentheNFTandthemetauniverseworld;

- EPT environmental protection chain game clearing and settlement is
completedinrealtimethroughsmartcontracts,realizingmoreefficient,convenient
andsafeclearingandsettlement;
- EPTenvironmentalprotectionchaingamesreducethetrustcostbetween
individualsbyminimizingdependenceontrust;
- Promotethein-depthdevelopmentoftheplaytoearnmodel,makingit
moreconvenientforusersto"playwhileearning"intheprocessofparticipatingin
EPTenvironmentalprotectionchaingames.

EPTenvironmentalprotectionchaingamesexpecteveryonetobetheirown
master,everyone canfreelyschedule theirownassets,andwillnotbepeeped,
supervised,andblockedbycentralizedinstitutions.Therefore,EPTenvironmental
protectionchaingameswillbuildagameecologyonthebasisofdecentralization,
privacy,andfairness,ensuringsafetyandfairnessofeachplayer’sparticipation,
whilestrippingawaytheharmofcentralizationandbuildingatruedecentralized
ecologyTheclosedloop ofcircle and value establishesa connection between
virtualandreality,allowingNFTandMetaversetopromotetheprogressofEPT
environmentalprotectionchaingameswhilecreatingpersonalvalue.

### 4 2 EPTMallecology..................................................................................................................

Themallisoneoftheimportantlandingcirculationscenariosoftheblockchain,
andEPTwillworkwithmanyphysicalmerchantstobuildablockchainmall.Various
commodities (environmentallyfriendlycommodities,dailycommodities) can be
exchangeddirectlythrough EPT.Letmoreusers enjoybetterqualityandmore
favorableproductsthroughthemall.

EPT Mall combines the consumption needs of clothing, food, housing,
transportation and entertainment to create a multi-scenario, fun, and social
shoppingexperienceforusers,soastoobtainricheruserportraits,buildamember
ecology,improveuserstickiness,andmakeuserportraitdatamoreaccurate.Inthe


processofbuildinganecosystem,blockchaintechnologyisusedtocollectuser
personal information under the premise of ensuring privacy,and to open up
informationbarriersbetweenmultipleapplications,andprovideservicesunderthe
constraintsofsmartcontracts:

- Consumers,retailers,suppliers,etc.alljointheEPTblockchainnetworkand
definebehaviorsthatmeettheirneedsbasedonrelatedsmartcontracts;
- Retailers establish a platform to assist the operation ofthe blockchain
network. According to the functions defined by its smart contract, it obtains
tradable consumer data from the blockchain, obtains the data consumption
demandissuedbythesupplierfromtheplatform,andmatchesdatatransactions.

EPTwillcreateanopenandinnovativespaceforthenewgameplayofthemall
throughinfrastructureconstructionsuchastheunderlyingsystem,EPTtokens,and
onlineandofflinedigitalpayments.Atthesametime,it willlinkglobalsupply
chains,games,communities,exchanges,etc.,toallowmorepeopleIntheprocess
ofshopping,getecologicalincentives.Ouroverallbusinessgoalistoachieve:

- Createaconvenientspacethatincludesenvironmentallyfriendlyproducts
anddailyconsumerproductsofallcategories;
- Buildaconsensusonglobalshoppingbehavior;
- Speed ​ ​ uptheresearchanddevelopmentofdecentralizedecological
bottomtechnology;
- Increasetheapplicationofdigitizationandtokenizationinpeople'sdailylife;
- Driveonlineandofflinedigitalpaymentsbasedon EPTtokens,whichare
convenient,fast,transparentandopen.

Specifically,throughtheunderlyinginfrastructure,EPTprovidesthemallwith
underlyinginfrastructuresupportbasedonblockchaintechnology,andachievesa
panoramiclandingofecologicalapplications.Inaddition,EPTwillintegratebig
data,algorithmmodels,naturallanguageprocessingandothertechnicalmeansto
createan ecosystem on thechain and empower the development of the real
economy.Commercialplatformsbased on the EPTunderlyingsystem (such as
smart wallets, mall APPs), service demanders, service providers, service


communicators, service witnesses and other roles, participate in and assume
correspondingsocialfunctions,andbreakorganizationalandnationalboundaries.
Formaglobalized,multi-partycollaborativeecosystem.

Use the EPT token economic model to incentivize all participants in the
ecosystem,drivethedigitization andtokenization ofthe existingmallincentive
model,assetchaining,andsolvebusinessmodelinnovationissues,andusethisas
anopportunitytodriveusers,businesses,andThetripartitewin-winbetweenthe
platforms allows more people, institutions, and enterprises to share the
convenienceand dividends broughtaboutbythe development ofscienceand
technology.

Whileensuringtheuseofdisruptivetechnologiesandimprovingtheefficiency
of e-commerce sharing economic growth, EPT Mall hopes that through
technologicalinnovationandmechanisminnovation,eachparticipantinthechain
businesseconomic value chain willhavelong-termdevelopmentopportunities,
and each A user and organization can efficiently integrate into the entire
e-commerceeconomy,andobtain morevaluebenefits bypracticinginnovative
consumptionconcepts.


### 4 3 EPTlendingecology...........................................................................................................

The EPTtargetmarket istoserveglobalfinancial players(both digitaland
non-digital currency players), provide lending solutions for financial people
interestedininvestingaroundtheworld.Tothisend,EPTwillgiveintangibledigital
assetsthesamestatusasrealestate,andconductmortgagedshort-termlending
andfinancinglendingwithinacontrollablevalue.

```
1 )ImplementationdetailsofEPTlending
```
```
The loan contract mustbecompletedon the EPTplatform.First,both the
borrowerandthelenderneedtoregistertheplatformaccountontheEPT,
andthenlogontotheplatform;thelendingadvertisementspostedbythe
borrowerandthelenderontheEPTareallopenandtransparentandhave
strong personal privacy. Both borrowers and lenders can publish
advertisements for borrowing or lending according to their own
circumstances.Thecontentincludesinformationsuchasinterestrate,loan
period,maximumloanamount,andthenameofthemortgageddigitalasset.
Thedigitalassetsofbothborrowersandlendershavehugepricevolatility,so
EPTofficialsdonotbeartheinvestmentriskscausedbypricefluctuations.
Both parties conduct transactions and lending within their respective
capabilities.TheEPTplatformonlyendorsesthesecurityoftheassetsofboth
parties,anddoesnotendorsetherisks.Sexasaguarantee.
```
```
2 )Mortgageloanbusinessprocess
```
- Boththefundborrowerandthelenderhaveregisteredplatformaccounts
    andloggedintotheEPTplatform.
- Thelenderpublishesloanadvertisementsbasedonthescopeofbusiness,
    including interest rates, loan periods, maximum loan amounts, and the
    names of digital assets that accept mortgages. Borrowers issue loan
    advertisementsaccordingtotheirownfundingneeds,includingtheamount,
    loanrepaymentperiod,maximumloanamount,andthenameofthedigital
    assettobemortgaged.
- Theborrowerandlenderseeeachother’sadvertisements,chooseproducts
    thatmeettheirneeds,andconductanonymouschatsandsignelectronic
    contractsontheplatform.


- Theborrowerpledgesthecorrespondingdigitalassetstothecorresponding
    assetpooloftheplatform.
- Aftertheplatformreceivesthepledgedassets,itinformsthelenderthatit
    canmakealoan.
- Thelendergrantsthecorrespondingamounttotheborrower,andprovides
    corresponding vouchers, and the contract is finally established after
    verificationbythesystem.

**3 )Repaymentbusinessprocess**

- Theborrower'splatformcheckstheprincipalandinterestoftheloan.
- Accordingtotherequiredrepaymentoffunds,handlingfeesandinterest.
- Theplatformconfirmsthereceiptoftheplatformcurrency,basedonthe
    borrower'strustworthinessandnormalrepayment,theplatformrewardsthe
    correspondingplatformcurrency,andthecontractends.
- Thesystemcalculatesplatformhandlingfeesandcredithandlingfeesbased
    onthepaymentvouchertime.
- Theplatformpaysthecorrespondingvalueofplatformcurrencyasneeded
    andpaysittothelender,andthecontractends.

**4 )Renewalorearlyrepaymentprocess**

- Theborrowerissuesanapplication 3 daysinadvanceandwaitsforthelender
    toreply.
- Ifthelenderdoesnotagreetorenewtheloan,itwillproceedinaccordance
    withtheoriginalcontract.
- Ifthe lender agrees to theloan renewalrequest,the contracttimeand
    maturityinterestwillbeextendedontheoriginalbasis.
- Earlyrepaymentrequirestheborrowertoapplyin advance.Ifthelender
    agrees,thecontractcanbeterminatedearly,ifnot,theoriginalcontractmust
    befollowed.


**5 )Overduebusinessprocess**

- Thepledgeddigitalassetreachestherepaymentperiodof 5 days,triggering
    theriskwarningsystem.
- Theplatformsystemautomaticallyinformstheborrowertocarryoutthe
    repaymentbusiness.
- Ifthedebtisnotrepaidwhentherepaymentperiodexpires.
- Theplatformdirectlydeductsthedigitalassetspledgedbytheborrowerto
    thelender.

**6 )Creditbigdatasharingmodelandcreditloans**

The EPTplatform itselfisacredit-baseddigitalassetpledgeloan platform.
Users of the platform themselves accumulate corresponding creditvalue
through business transactions. Credit value is an important judgment
attributeofauser,whichisconducivetoaccumulatinghigh-qualitycustomer
data,therebyconvertinghigh-qualitydataintoaccuratecustomerresources.

- Usersaccumulatecreditbyparticipatinginlendingbehaviorontheplatform.
- EPTuserscanmakeunsecuredorlow-securedcreditloansbasedontheir
    creditfactor.
- EPT high-quality users can participate in high-quality financialplatform
    projectsconnectedto the platform andenjoy the best qualificationsfor
    participation.
- High-quality credit users have the opportunity to participate in the
    managementofthefund.


### 4 4 ADeFi-basedcrowdfundingsystem..............................................................................

Basedontheteam'sexperienceinthefieldofcrowdfunding,wewillbuildthe
world's leading crowdfunding ecosystem with blockchain technology as the
foundationandEPTtokensasthemedium.

Withthesupportofthecrowdfundingmodel,EPTtokens,asanincentiveside
chainandcross-chain financialapplicationsystemintheecosystem,solvemany
problemsexistinginthetraditionalfinancialfieldandtheexistingphysicalbusiness
and mall model through DeFi, NFT model and DAPP application.The EPT
crowdfunding ecosystem, as an application built by a strong open financial
protocol,willenablefinancialdataapplicationstogetthemostflexibledeployment
ontheplatform.

Under the support of the underlying technology, EPT will subvert the
traditional financial operation structure, build an open, innovative global
distributed business and financial system, build perfect distributed financial
infrastructure, massive distributed financial applications, quickly link the user
groups,canflowtoproductsandecological,breakthetraditionalplatformbarriers,
reduceeconomiclosses,optimizethebenefitchain,pointoutthedirectionforthe
developmentofintelligentfinance!

```
1 )Crowdfundingactivities
```
Manyeventcreatorsdonotneedtocreatetheirowncryptocurrencyortokens.
Forexample,thecreatorfinancestheproductionofadramaorrecordsanalbum.
Alltheycandoispromiseacertainreturntotheirfunders.Inmostcases,funders
getnothingbutpromises,becausetheir interestsarenot guaranteed.TheEPT
crowdfunding ecosystem provides funders with their own currency EPT, thus
solvingthisproblem.Therefore,when theyuse fundstosupport crowdfunding
activities,fundersnotonlygetpromises(thisisthesameasothercrowdfunding
platforms),buttheyalsogetarealvaluableasset— EPTasareward.

EPTnotonlyincreasesinvalueovertime,itcanalsobeusedforpaymenton
theEPTplatform.ThiswillmakeEPTliquidandpractical.EPTownerswillbeableto
usethesedigitalassetstoinitiatecrowdfundingactivities,obtainprofessionalhelp
indesigningcrowdfundingactivities,andvariousservicesofpaymentconsultants,


crowdfundingescrowactivitiesreviewers,translators,architects,andotherfunders
aroundtheworld.

```
2 )Crowdfundingactivities
```
Currently,thereisnopopularcrowdfundingplatformthatallowscreatorsto
carryoutcrowdfundingactivities.Thisisduetothelackofrelevantlegalstructures
thatallowfundersfrommanydifferentcountries/regionstobecomebeneficiaries
ofastartupcompany.However,BSCtechnologyallowsustoignoresuchproblems.
Codecansolveproblemsthatcannotbesolvedbythelegalsystem.Wenowhave
theopportunitynotonlytoorganizecrowd-investingeventsforresidentsofone
country,butalsoforpeopleallovertheworld,regardlessoftheirplaceofresidence,
jurisdiction,nationality,andotherbureaucraticobstacles.Tokensgiveitmeaningin
termsofcompanyownershiporprofitshare,orothervaluablethingsdetermined
bythecreatoroftheevent(differentfromeventtoevent).

With theabovecharacteristics,EPThasestablishedacollaborativeplacefor
different audiences who have never interacted before, the creators of
cryptocurrency projects and their funders, or the creators of traditional
crowdfundingactivitiesandtheirfundersandprojectswhohaveneverdealtwith
cryptocurrencybefore.Sponsor,andexperiencedconsultants,reviewers,architects,
translatorsandotherexpertteamsallovertheworld.AllpartiesbenefitfromEPT's
newsystem:thecreatorshaveaccesstonewaudiencesandfundingsources,as
wellasthehelpofdifferentconsultants,whichalsogreatlyreducesmanagement
costs. For the first time, funders receive project failure protection, have the
opportunitytoreceivevalueassetsasareturnoninvestment,andcanreachawider
rangeofprojects.Participantsfromallover theworldhavethe opportunityto
receivethereturnvalueoftheirinvestment.

Therefore,intheEPTcrowdfundingecosystem,itisveryimportanttoform
mutually beneficial and strong relationships among sponsors, funders and
communities. The EPT crowdfunding ecosystem also extends the platform
frameworkandcreatesatransparentecosystemtounitecommunities,fundersand
projects.


# Chapter V

# EPT is certified

# economic model


### 5 1 EPTTokenEconomics.........................................................................................................

EPT is ablockchain-basedsettlementdigitalasset,issued with theBinance
SmartChainprotocol,andusedforexchange,settlement,trading,liquiditymining,
pledgelending,chainentertainment,consumerpayment,etc.ontheEPTsystem.
The"Token"incentivemechanismestablishedbyusersthroughthedigitalassets
generatedbytheenvironmentalprotectionchainEPTprovidessubstantiverewards
for people's garbage classification and environmental protection behaviors to
encourage hundreds of millions of people to participate in activities against
environmentaldegradation.

```
TotalEPTissuance: 300 million
```
```
EPTdistributionplan:
```

- 10 % isusedfortheecologicaldevelopmentofenvironmentalprotection
chaingames,mallsystems,lendingandcrowdfundingsectors;
- 30 %isusedforecologicalairdroptosupportthedevelopmentofmarket
communities;
- 5 % of the environmental protection fund for public welfare, used for
environmentalprotectionandpublicwelfareundertakingsandthedevelopmentof
thepublicchainofEPTinthefuturetobuildecologicaldevelopment;
- 40 % added liquidity U pool mining, used for the creation of EPTswap
exchangeUpool,byaddingEPT/USDTcapitalpool,pledgeLPforliquidmining
output;
- 10 %EPTsinglecurrencypledgemining;
- 5 %oftheexternaloutstandingecologywillbeconnectedtoEPTswap,and
more Token will be airdropped to the cardholders of the EPT environmental
protection community. The development of EPTswap will be decided by the
proposalofallcommunitymembers.

EPT will be used for the incubation and co-construction of high-quality
blockchainprojects.Forhigh-qualityprojectsconnectedtothecommunity,liquid
miningisusedtosupportthecommunitytobuildanEPT/XXXfundpool.Asa
benchmark,acertainshareofairdropswillbegiventocardholders.shareholder.
Through smartcontractEPTsinglecurrencypledgeminingandaddingliquidity
EPT/USDTLPpledgemining,thesetwomethodsareautomaticallyreducedby 10 %
everyyear.


### 5 2 ValuepropertiesoftheEPT..............................................................................................

```
1 )Propertyrights
```
IntheEPRplatform,userswithEPTenjoytheownershipanddisposalrightsof
theproxy,thatis,enjoythepropertyrightsofthetoken,andcandisposeofthe
proxyarbitrarilywithinthescopeprescribedbylaw.

```
2 )Currencyattributes
```
The API centered on encrypted goods can realize data flow and proxy
circulation.OntheplatformcreatedbyEPT,userbehaviordata,electronicgoods,
andconsumptioncanallberecordedonthechain,andeffectivebehaviorscanbe
furthertransformedintogenerations.Eachmemberhasanindependentnodeand
sharesledgerdata,whicheffectivelyenhancesthetransparencyoftokenusage.In
otherwords,generationsbuildabridgeof"valueexchange".

```
3 )Equityattributes
```
EPTisadigitalgenerationinwhichtheplatformisoneofitsusagescenarios,
anduserswhoholdthisgenerationownequityintheplatform.Thatis,holdingEPT
uptoacertainamountismanifestedasholdingcurrencydividends,butitneedsto
beexplainedthatgenerationisnotaninvestment.

```
4 )Decentralizedgovernancemodel
```
Inadecentralizedgovernancesystem,anydecisionmustbevotedonwithina
fixedtime,andthis time variesaccordingtothecontentofthe proposal.The
proposalwillbeimplementedifandonlyifasufficientlyhighstakevoteiscollected,
otherwisetheproposalwillbeclosed.Inadecentralizedautonomoussystem,itis
notasingledecisionmadebythosewithhighequity.Thosewithlowequitycan
join forces to check and balance those with high equity. The content of
decentralizedautonomyincludes,butisnotlimitedto,userregistration,statistical
functions,rangeofmortgagetokens,etc.Theseupgradescanbedecidedbythe
participantsoftheautonomoussystemthroughvotingtogether.


### 5 3 Liquidityminingmodel......................................................................................................

LiquidityminingintheDeFifieldreferstotheprocessofdepositingorlending
designatedtokenassetsinaccordancewithrequirementsthroughDeFiproducts
withaminingmechanismtoprovideliquidityfortheproduct'sfundpooltoobtain
benefits.OntheEPTplatform,theproceedsaretheproject’snativetokenEPT
token,whichrepresentsthegovernancerightsofthefutureplatform.

WedevelopedtheEPTliquidityminingprotocol.Thisagreementisbasedonan
agreementon theBSC,usedtoestablish afundpoolbasedonchangesinthe
supplyanddemandofassetsandcalculatethe interest rate byalgorithm.The
supplierandborroweroftheassetinteractdirectlywiththeagreementtoearnor
payfloatinginterestrates.Whenwedesignaliquidminingplan,animportantstep
istodeterminetheexactgoaloftheplan.Thefollowingareourgeneralgoals:

- Incentivizelong-term,stickyliquidity;
- Attracta lot of hot money tocreate momentum and increase product
visibility;
- Distribute tokens without ICO and decentralize the governance of the
protocol.

In order to achieve the goal of protocol decentralized governance, many
protocolsinjectgovernancerightsintotheirtokens.However,iftheownershipof
governance tokens is highly concentrated, it is difficult to ensure the
decentralizationofprotocolgovernance.Oneofthemain challengesfacingthe
protocolteamishowtodistributetheirgovernancetokenstousers.Insolvingthis
problem,the EPTliquidityminingwedesignedcan beusedasapowerfultool
(comparedtoothermethods,suchasdirectionalairdrops).

```
1 )Supplyofassets
```
Inapeer-to-peerplatform,auser’sassetsareloanedtoanotheruser.Unlike
thepeer-to-peerplatformofanexchange,theagreementsummarizesthesupply
ofeach user,providesmoreliquidity,andmaintainsthebalanceofthefunding
system.Borrowersandlenderscanreceiverewards(interests)bycomplyingwith
thecorrespondingagreementswhilecirculatingdigitalcurrency.Atthesametime,
theexchangecanincreasetheagreementorrewardusersby"clearing"thebalance,


whichmayunlockanewbusinessmodelfortheEthereumecosystem.

```
2 )Borrowedassets
```
The EPT protocol allowsusers touse aToken ascollateraland effortlessly
borrowfromtheprotocolforuseanywhereintheBSCecosystem.Everymoney
markethasafloating interest rate setbymarketforces, which determinesthe
borrowingcostofeachasset.Theassetsheldbytheagreementhaveamortgage
factor ranging from 0 to 1. The liquidity and value of the underlying assets
determine thesizeofthemortgagefactor.Thecollateralandmultipliedbythe
collateralfactorareequaltotheuser'sloanableamount.

```
3 )Interestratemodel
```
Theagreementdoesnotneedtonegotiatewithsuppliers,borrowers,terms,
andinterestrates.Instead,itusesaninterestratemodelthatachievesinterestrate
equilibriumbasedonsupplyanddemand.Accordingtoeconomictheory,interest
rates(the"price"ofcurrency)shouldincreasewithdemand;whendemandislow,
interestratesshouldbelow,andviceversa.TheutilizationrateUofeachmarketa
unifiessupplyanddemandintoonevariable:

```
Ua=
a a
```
```
a
Cash Borrows
```
```
B

```
orrows

Demandcurvesareencodedbygovernanceandexpressedasafunctionof
utilization.Forexample,thelendingratemaybesimilarto:

```
BorrowingInterestBatea= 2. 5 %+Ua* 20 %
```
The rate earned by the supplier is implied and equal to borrowing rate
multiplicationutilization.

```
4 ）Liquidityincentivestructure
```
TheEPTprotocoldoesnothaveliquidity,butinsteadreliesontheinterestrate
modeltomotivateit.Duringperiodsofextremedemandfor assets,agreement
liquidity (token available for extraction or borrowing) willdecrease; when this
occurs, interest rates will rise, thereby stimulating supply and suppressing
borrowing.


### 5 4 Pledgelendingmodel........................................................................................................

In the EPT pledge lending agreement, users realize continuous financing
throughtheriskclassificationofthepledgetarget.Aftertheplatformprovidesthe
initial liquidity,the market maker locks the LP Token as a pledge in the EPT
agreement, soas to continuouslyobtain theliquidity purchase.When the user
providesliquidityintheEPTandsetsalargerange,thevaluefluctuation ofthe
liquiditytargetbasedonthestandardcurrencyissmall.

IfthesupplieredgestheLPTokenintheEPT,thepledgewillbesignificantly
improvedintheextrememarket,which willalsomaketheboosterpoolsystem
morestable:reasonableriskwarningwhentheprojecttokenisrisingsharply,and
goodriskbufferwhenthetokenfallssharply.EPTcaneventuallyallowhigh-quality
assetstoriseforthelongterm,andnon-performingassetswillgraduallydecline
andareeliminated.

Intheplatform,inordertoachievemoreaccurateriskpricing,itisnecessaryto
gradetherisks,soastoformafixedincomeclassificationfund.Inadditiontothe
projectsponsor(IP),twotypesofmajorrolesarerequired,dividedintosignificant
participants(GP)andfixedincome(LP).Bothroleswillprovidecontinuouscapital
inputfortheproject.GP,asthedirectinvestoroftheproject,willexchangeallthe
principalintoprojecttokens,andLPfundswillbeusedasleverageforGPtohelp
theprojectachievegreatervaluegrowth.

EPTallowsIPtopledgehigh-qualityassets,whichaddsalayerofsecurityfor
GPandencourageslargeamountsofGPcapitalinflows.EachGPcapitalinflowis
injectedintoVaulttostoretheLP'sriskreservesandprofits.Withtheincreaseof
Vaultcapitalvolume,LP'swillingnesstoinvesthasalsobeengraduallyenlarged.as
follows:

```
LPw∝ Vault∝ IPcol*GPturnover*IPltv
```
```
GPturnover∝ GPw
```
```
in:
```
- IPcolisthepledgeofIP
- IPltvisthecurrentpledgerateofIP


- GPturnoveristheturnoverrateofGP
- GPwistheinvestmentwillingnessofGP
- LPwistheinvestmentwillingnessofLP
- Vaultisthereserve

Itcanbeseenthatthrougheffectivesignaltransmission,theunderlyingassets
withlowerIPpledgevolatilityeffectivelydrivethecapitalcapacityofLP,andLP
capital,asthemostimportantpartofthemarketfeedbackloop,willexertapositive
multipliereffect.Iftheprojectisanon-performingasset,becauseGPparticipants
havereplacedtheirbasecurrencywithprojecttokens,thevolatilityofGP'sleverage
willbemuchhigherthanthevolatilityofIPpledges.Atthistime,GPmayfalldueto
thepriceofprojectassets.Andwasthefirsttobeclearedout.TheremainingGPs
aremorewillingtoenjoythepledgeaftertheIPiscleared,therebyreducingthe
turnoverrate.ThistimedirectlyledtotheshrinkingofVault'sincrements,which
greatly reduced the LP's investment willingness, which in turn caused inferior
projectstobegraduallycleared.

```
LPw∝ IPcol*GPturnover
```
```
GPturnover↓ ⇒ LPw ↓
```
Such transmission mechanism can not only make EPT operate healthily,
becomeascavengerofnon-performingassets,butalsotransmitalargeamountof
effectivemarketinformation,astheexternalfeedingdataofEPTriskpricing,to
providedecisionfeedbacktoinvestorsandliquidityproviders.


chapter VI

Global Team and DAO

governance


### 6 1 TheEPTGlobalTeam..........................................................................................................

EPT core architects and R and D personnel come from top technology
companies,whicharealltechnologygiantswithmorethan 10 yearsofexperience
inresearchanddevelopment.Fromtheblockchain 1. 0 stage,theyarewellversedin
theapplicationofblockchaindistributedsystems.

AymericIzard——Blockchaintechnicalexperts.In 2015 ,Ibegantostudythe
digitalassettradingnetworkandcapitaldocking.In 2016 ,Ifirstproposedthemost
advanceddigitalwalletconcept.Theinternationalseniorblockchaintechnology
researcherandadvocateshaverichexperienceandkeensenseofsmellinthefield
of digital assets and finance.Focusing on global investment in new markets,
covering emerging industries and high-tech industries, including finance,
technologydevelopment,InternetofThings,newretaillife,consumercommunity,
etc.

RickFishbune——Havingbeenengagedinblockchaintechnologyresearchfor
more than 10 years, the most influential internationally renowned blockchain
expertintheUnitedStateshasparticipatedinthedevelopmentofanumberof
famous blockchain projects.Famous data scientist, with rich international
experience.Extensive experience in strategic design, data infrastructure
construction,andprocessesinmultipleindustriesaroundtheworld.

JayLim——Globalforeignexchangetradingandtechnologyimplementation
consultantexpert, more than 20 years ofexperience, hasserved anumber of
DeutscheBank,INGBank,BankofHollandandothermultinationalbanks.Bitcoin,
anearlyinvestorandawell-knownopinionleaderinthecurrencycircle,has 8 years
offuturesandinternationalderivativestradingexperience.In 2013 ,hebeganto
investindigitalcurrency,isfamiliarwithvariouscapitaloperationtechniques,andis
goodattrendtechnologyanalysisandmacrostrategyresearch.

RichardDobrow——Seniorblockchainfieldpractitioners,morethan 5 yearsof
experienceintheblockchainindustry,familiarwithvariousblockchainunderlying
andarchitecturetechnologies.Itisoneoftheearliestpeopleengagedinmobile
Internetproducts.Itisengagedincombiningbigdatawithblockchain,andithas
richexperienceinproductdesign.


Justin Drake——Blockchain senior engineer, with practical experience in
blockchain,encryptionalgorithm,digitalwallet,hasmorethantenyearsofC/C+
+programminganddevelopmentexperiencein Linux / windowsenvironment,
proficient in network programming under Linux, POSIX multi-threaded
programmingandSTLprogramming,writingshellscriptsandMakefile,proficient
indatastructure,commonlyusedalgorithms,depth,breadth,geneticsandother
artificialintelligencealgorithms.

Maaghul Clinton——Master in Computer Application, over 10 years of
experienceintheIT&ICTindustry.Specializedinsoftwareprojectmanagement,
team building, mobile Internet solution design, software algorithms, and ICT
consultingservices.Withworkingexperienceintheworld'stop 500 enterprises,I
leads the teammembersto solvethe problems of carbon emission resources
distributionindustryandreachtheindustry-leadinglevel.

MatthewWalther——World-renownedblockchainapplicationexpert,global
blockchaintechnologycommercialapplicationleader.Heservedasadirectorofthe
USBusinessCouncil,aPhDinsociologyatColumbiaUniversityandaresearcherat
theCenterforFinancialResearch.Heisanauthorityintheapplicationofsmart
financetechnology.

### 6 2 CommunityDAOgovernance..........................................................................................

DAO (DAO, Decentralized Autonomous Organization) is a decentralized
self-governingorganization.Therelevantconceptwasfirstproposedbyitsfounder,
VitalikButerin.ThefirstDAOprojectisTheDAO(adecentralizedFoundationto
invest in potentialEthereumprojects).Tounderstand,DAOneedstomeetthree
characteristics:decentralization,autonomyandorganization.

Decentralizationreferstothemonopolyandabsolutediscoursepowerbrought
by DAO that needs to be structured on the public blockchain to avoid the
centralization of power from the technical level.Autonomy means that the
development and rules of projects are completely controlled by community
members.Communitymemberscaninitiateproposalsforcertain thingsthatare
automaticallyenforcedoncetheproposalisvotedthrough,andallmembershave


thepowertogoverntheproject.OrganizationisasocialgroupinwhichDAOdoes
notneedtobe operatedbycompanies or institutions,people gather together
throughcommunityconsensus,andpeopleworktowardsacommongoal.

One of the biggest values of DAO lies in decentralized governance.The
combinationofDAOandDeFiconceptscancreatemorevaluableprojects.DeFi,like
DAO,hasadecentralizedquality,andmanyliquidityminingdecisionsandfeesin
DeFineedtosolicitregularadvicefromcommunitymembers,andDAOisusedasa
governancetool.

OntheintegrationofDeFi+DAO,thedesignofEPTisfullofinnovationand
attractions.Fromthegovernanceofasinglecapitalpool,tothegovernanceof
Swapsub-protocol,tothegovernanceofthewholeprojectecology,EPTintegrates
DAOelementsintoeverycorneroftheecology.

```
1 ）EPTDAO
```
EPTisacompletelyautonomouscommunity-ledproject.Undertheleadership
ofDAO,ithasachievedcompletedecentralizationandahighdegreeofcommunity
consensus. The new decentralized autonomous organization initiated by EPT
belongstothecategoryofdedicatedDAO.Thecommunityhasastrongconsensus
and 100 % of the community manages itself. After the project goes live, the
communitywillvotetodevelopitsowndecentralizedapplicationsandDAPPs.

EPT DAO's global community construction follows a high degree of
decentralization, and is carried out through a combination of on-chain and
off-chainmodels.AfteralltheprogramsofEPTDAOaresetsuccessfully,itcanstart
tooperateaccordingtotheoriginalrules.In thecourseofitsoperation,itcan
continuetomaintainandupgradeitselfaccordingtotheactualsituation.Through
the continuous self-improvement mechanism, it not only eliminates the trust
problem,butalsoachievesanunprecedentedlevelofcollectivecoordination,thus
formingthetechnicalfoundationofEPTDAO.

- SmartcontractsenabletechnicalimplementationofEPTDAOrules;
- TheEPTtokeneconomicmodelprovidesarealisticincentivebasisforthe
distributionofbenefitsofEPTDAO;
- Theblockchainitselfconnectsindividualsororganizationsaroundtheworld,


allowingtheexpansionofEPTDAOtobreakthroughgeographicalrestrictions.

EPTtokensareusedasvaluecirculationproofandincentivemeans,andthen
smartcontractsareusedtodeterminethe cooperativerelationshipandbenefit
distributionmodeofmembers.Thereisnoclearidentitydivisionamongmembers.
Forexample,investors,developers,collaborators,operators,consumers,etc.,will
become part ofthe communitybecauseoftheirtoken holdings.Memberscan
continuetooptimize thecontractstructurebythemselves,constantlyseekthe
shortestpath,maintainefficientsynergyandbetterdevelopmentdirection.

```
2 ）ThevalueoftheEPTDAO
```
As a decentralized autonomous organization,EPT DAOis a technical tool
writtenincodeandrunningontheblockchain.Itisalsoanewtypeofgovernance
institution that can achieve opennessandjustice, unmannedintervention and
autonomousoperation,andthereisnolaw.entity.

- Maximizetheuseofresources:EPTDAOstoresallcontentinadecentralized
storagenetwork,whichisopenandtransparentandcannotbe tamperedwith.
Anyone can review project rule changes, etc., andschedule resourcesin time,
withouttheneedfortime-consumingreview.
- Realizeinnovativedevelopment:PeopleinEPTDAOcanputforwardtheir
opinionsontheblockchain atanytimeandbeseenbyothers.Userscanmore
convenientlyandtimelyparticipateinthedevelopmentofEPTDAOandpromote
theinnovativedevelopmentofprojects.
- Improvethecredibilityoftheresults:TheuseoftheEPTDAOdistributed
ledgerwillmakeeveryvoteofthevoterberecordedontheblockchaininatrueand
open manner,withouttheneedfor manualvotecountingtogenerateelection
results,whichistimelyandcredible.

EPT DAOwill be thecore driving force of EPT ecological governance and
development.EPThopestostimulatethesubjectiveinitiativeofthecommunityina
democratic,collaborative,andtransparentmanner,mobilizehigh-qualityresources
in the community, and promote the construction of a decentralized and
positively-driven EPT autonomous system. At the same time, the EPT DAO
ManagementCommitteewasestablishedtoberesponsibleforthepromotionof
EPTDAO'svariousaffairs.


ThemembersoftheEPTDAOmanagementcommitteecannotonlycontribute
to the development of EPT, but also obtain additional profits through the
implementationoftheproposal.TheEPTDAOmanagementcommitteedoesnot
haveahierarchicalstructure.Allmembersareequal,andtheinterestgoalsarethe
same. Only by jointly promoting the value growth ofthe EPT ecology can it
conform to the interests of all members and form a virtuous cycle of EPT
governanceecology.


Chapter VII

EPT International Foundation for

Environmental Protection


EPT InternationalEnvironmental Protection Foundation isthe advocate and
initiator of the EPT project. The foundation is a multinational non-profit
organization that is supervised by the International Environmental Protection
Foundationandprovidesenvironmentalassetmanagement.Thefoundationwill
createsustainableprosperityundertheuserconsensusmechanism,usescenarios
asthe drivingforcetosolvepracticalpain points,andpromoteenvironmental
protectiontechnologytoserveindustrialprogressandsocialdevelopment.The
foundationhasmultipleself-operatedassetmanagementteams,operatingmore
than 1 , 000 tradersandtechnicalteamsinEurope,NorthAmericaandSoutheast
Asia.

- Vision: Use blockchain technology to promote the development of
environmental protection, garbage classification, and environmental pollution
reduction
- Mission:Createalow-carbonandenvironmentallyfriendlyworldandsolve
theproblemofsocialgovernanceofwastesorting
- Value:environmentalprotectionpublicwelfarevalue,circulationapplication
value

```
Thefoundation'sdevelopmentgoalsareasfollows:
```
With theEPTprojectasthecore,thefoundationiscommittedtoproviding
"connectedvalue"services.Thisservicehasthreelevelsofmeaning:

Thefirstistoconnectrealitywiththefuture.Asoneofthemostpotential
technologicaldevelopmentdirectionsforhumanbeingsatthisstage,blockchain
technology means that the future is infinite. But at this stage, there are
contradictionsandconflictsbetweentherealisticpressureofgreenecologyand
the future of blockchain. The foundation hopes that through EPT's innovative
consensus mechanism, it can find a balance between the two and unify the
oppositionbetweenrealityandthefuture.

Thesecondistoconnectpeopleandnature.Eco-environmentalprotectionis
an urgent practical need, but it is also the foundation of the long-term
developmentofmankind.Reducingenergyconsumptionandadvancingagreen
earthisamajorissueabouttheharmoniousdevelopmentofmanandnature.EPT
mustservemankindaswellasnature.


Thethirdistoconnectuserswiththeblockchain.Atthisstage,digitalcurrency
isthemostconcentratedembodiment ofthecharmofblockchain technology.
When theinitialdigital currencysystem represented by Bitcoin sufferedmajor
setbacks,EPT hastheresponsibilitytotake overthepredecessor's bannerand
assumethehistoricalresponsibilityofexploringthefutureofdigitalcurrencyand
blockchain.

In the future, the foundation will be committed to the development,
construction,operationandmaintenanceoftheEPTprojecttoensurethesafeand
harmoniousdevelopmentoftheecology.Inordertoavoidincidentsthatviolate
thedesignconceptoftheblockchain,thefoundationwillhelpmanagethegeneral
issuesandprivilegesofcommunityprojectsbyformulatingagoodgovernance
structureandsystem.Theestablishmentofthefoundationreferstotheoperation
of traditional entities, and various functional committees will be established,
includingthestrategicdecision-makingcommittee,thetechnicalreviewcommittee,
theremunerationandnominationcommittee,andthepublicrelationscommittee.

Asaninnovativetechnology,blockchainisnotonlyasubversivebreakthrough
in the core computer technology,but also an innovation in an industryfield.
Therefore, the importance of the risk management system is self-evident.The
design objectives ofthe foundation'sgovernance structure mainlyconsiderthe
sustainabilityofprojectdevelopment,theeffectivenessofstrategyformulation,the
effectiveness of management, risk management and control, and the efficient
operationoftheproject.

Therefore,the foundationupholdstheestablishment ofarisk-orientedand
sustainableblockchaincommunity.Thefoundationwillcarryoutcontinuousrisk
managementfortheoperationofthefoundation.Includingaseriesofactivities
suchastheestablishmentofrisksystem,riskassessment,andriskresponse.For
majorrisks,itisnecessaryfortheFoundation'sStrategicDecisionCommitteeto
discussandmakedecisions.

Thefoundationwillclassifyeventsaccordingtothecharacteristicsoftheevent,
suchasthedegreeofimpactoftheevent,thescopeofinfluence,theamountof
affectedtokens,andtheprobabilityofoccurrence,andmakedecisionsbasedon
priority.Foreventswithhighpriority,therelevantcommitteeofthefoundationwill
beorganizedtomakedecisionsassoonaspossible.


## ChapterVIII.Disclaimer.................................................................................................................


Nothing in this white paper constitutes legal,financial, commercial or tax
advice. You should consult your own legal, financial, commercial or other
professional advisers before participating in any activities related to this.
Communitystaff,projectR&Dteammembers,third-partyR&Dorganizations,and
serviceprovidersdonotneedtobeliablefordirectorindirectdamagesandlosses
thatmayresultfromtheuseofthiswhitepaper.

This white paper is for general information reference only, and does not
constituteanyoffertosolicitinvestment,ortosellanyproducts,articlesorassets
(whether digitalassets orother assets).The followinginformation maynot be
exhaustiveanddoesnotimplyanyelementsrelatedtothecontract.

The white paper cannot guarantee the accuracy or completeness of the
information,nordoesitguaranteeorpromisetoprovidean explanationofthe
accuracyandcompletenessoftheinformation.Inthecasethatthiswhitepaper
containsinformationobtainedfromathirdparty,thecommunityandprojectteam
have not independently verified the accuracy and completeness of such
information.In addition,what you needtounderstandisthatthesurrounding
environmentandconditionsmaychangeatanytime,sothiswhitepapermaybe
outofdateasaresult,andthecommunityhasnoobligationtoupdateorcorrect
contentanddocumentsrelatedtothis.

Anypartofthiswhitepaperdoesnotconstituteandwillnotconstituteany
offer fromthecommunity,distributors andanysales team(asdefined in this
agreement),norcan thecontentstatedinthewhitepaperbereliedonforany
contract and investment decisions Thebasics. Nothing contained in thiswhite
papercanbeusedasastatement,promiseorguaranteeoffutureperformance.By
accessingandusingthiswhitepaperoranyofitscontent,youwillprovidethe
followingguaranteestothecommunity,itsaffiliatesandyourteam:

InanydecisiontopurchaseToken,youhavenotreliedonanystatementin
thiswhitepaper;

You will voluntarily bear the costs and ensure compliance with all laws,
regulatoryrequirementsandrestrictionsthatapplytoyou(asthecasemaybe);

Youacknowledge,understandandagreethatTokenmayhavenovalue,does
notguaranteenorrepresentsanyvalueandcirculationattributes,andcannotbe
usedforspeculation-relatedinvestments;


Thecommunityanditsaffiliatesandteammembersarenotresponsibleor
liableforthevalue,transferability,liquidityofToken,andanymarketthatprovides
EPTthroughathirdpartyorothermeans;

You acknowledge,understandandagreethatifyouareacitizen,national,
resident(tax orotherrelated),residencyorgreencardholderofacountrythat
meets the following conditions, you will not be able to purchase any Token
qualifications:

i.ThesaleofTokenmaybedefinedorinterpretedasthesaleofsecurities(no
matterwhatthenameis)orinvestmentproducts;

ii.The law prohibits access to and participation in the sale of Tokens or
countriesandregionswhereTokensareprohibitedbylaws,policies,regulations,
treatiesoradministrativeregulations.

The EPT team does not and does not intend to make any statements,
guaranteesandpromisestoanyentityorindividual,andherebydeclaresthatit
doesnotassumeanyresponsibility(includingbutnotlimitedtotheaccuracyand
completenessofthecontentofthiswhite paperandthecontentofanyother
materialspublishedbythecommunity)Timeliness,TimelinessandReliability).To
themaximumextentpermittedbylaw,thecommunity,relatedentitiesandservice
providersshallnotberesponsibleforanyuseofthecontentofthewhitepaper,
relatedmaterialspublishedbythecommunity,orrelatedcontentdisplayedinother
forms(includingbutnotlimitedtoanyerrorsoromissions)Liabilityforindirect,
special,incidental, indirect or otherforms ofdamagecausedbytort,contract
disputes or other forms(including butnot limitedtoany resultingliability for
breachofcontractornegligence,anyincomeAndlossofprofitsandlossofusage
anddata).Potential buyers shouldcarefullyconsider andevaluateallrisks and
uncertainties (including financial, legal and uncertain risks) related to sales,
communities,distributorsandteams.

Theinformationprovidedinthiswhitepaperisforcommunitydiscussiononly
andisnotlegallybinding.Nooneisobligedtoenterintoanycontractorbinding
legalcommitmentfortheacquisitionofEPT.Inaddition,thiswhitepaperwillnot
acceptanyvirtualcurrencyorotherformsofpayment.TheTokensaleandpurchase
agreementandlong-termcontinuousholdingofTokenmustcomplywithasetof


independent terms or apurchase agreement (as the case may be) containing
relevanttermsandconditions.Thesetermsandconditionswillbeprovidedtoyou
separately or can be obtained from the website. Ifthere is anyinconsistency
betweenthesetermsandconditionsandthiswhitepaper,pleaserefertothese
termsandconditions.


